tests/verbs.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../zab.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../zab.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "habitual":
    cwez<v><tv><hab> : rcwez
    dub<v><iv><hab> : rdub

  "regular perfective":
    dub<v><iv><perf> : bdub
    nalaz<v><tv><perf> : mnalaz

  "irregular perfective":
    guily<v><tv><perf> : bdily
    gub<v><tv><perf> : bdub

  "regular irrealis":
    deidy<v><dtv><irre> : ydeidy

  "irregular irrealis":
    deidy<v><tv><irre> : teidy
    guily<v><tv><irre> : quily
    gub<v><tv><irre> : cub

  "regular progressive":
    dinal<v><tv><prog> : cadinal

  "irregular progressive":
    dub<v><iv><prog> : candub
    dub<v><iv><prog> : caldub
